Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.715.060

Office of the education ombuds—Notification.

RCW 28A.600.510 (1) and (2), related to provision of information about the office of the education ombuds, governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.715.020 and apply to state-tribal education compact schools established under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 222 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—2022 c 222: See note following RCW 28A.600.510.